New York, session 2025-2026, A11072.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 2 1358 to read as follows: 3 § 1358. Allergen labeling for menu items. 1. Definitions. As used in 4 this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings: 5 (a) "Food service establishment" means any building, vehicle, place or 6 structure, or any room or division in a building, vehicle, place or 7 structure where food is prepared, served or sold for immediate consump- 8 tion on or in the vicinity of the premises, called for or taken out by 9 customers, or prepared prior to being delivered to another location for 10 consumption. 11 (b) "Menu" means a list or pictorial display of a prepared food item 12 or items available for sale from a food service establishment for the 13 purpose of permitting a customer to order such food item or items, 14 including such list or pictorial display posted online for a customer to 15 place food orders for delivery or take-out. 16 (c) (i) "Major food allergen" means: 17 (A) milk, eggs, fish, crustacean shellfish, tree nuts, wheat, peanuts, 18 sesame, and soybeans; and 19 (B) a food ingredient that contains protein derived from a food named 20 in clause (A) of this subparagraph. 21 (ii) "Major food allergen" does not include: 22 (A) any highly refined oil derived from a food specified in clause (A) 23 of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph or any ingredient derived from 24 such highly refined oil; or 25 (B) any ingredient that is exempt under the petition or notification 26 process specified in the Food Allergen Labeling and Consumer Protection 27 Act of 2004, as amended. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15412-02-6 A. 11072 2 1 2. Menu labeling requirement. Every food service establishment doing 2 business in the state of New York shall provide clear and conspicuous 3 written notice of major food allergens that the food service establish- 4 ment knows, or reasonably should know, are contained as an ingredient in 5 each menu item, including temporary menu items. 6 3. Method of disclosure. A food service establishment shall provide 7 major food allergen identification for each menu item: 8 (a) conspicuously and directly on any physical or digital menu, imme- 9 diately above, beneath, or adjacent to each menu item; and 10 (b) each major food allergen shall be identified either with a clear 11 written statement in the same language as the rest of the menu, or by 12 using easily recognizable pictograms that are accompanied by a conspicu- 13 ous key located on the same menu. 14 4. Menu items without allergens. Menu items that do not contain any 15 major food allergen shall require no additional ingredient identifica- 16 tion. 17 5. Penalties. Any food service establishment that violates the 18 provisions of this section, or any rules or regulations promulgated 19 hereunder, shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed one hundred 20 twenty-five dollars for each violation. 21 6. Rules and regulations. The department shall promulgate rules and 22 regulations as necessary to implement the provisions of this section. 23 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 24 it shall have become a law.